Nevada, session 83, AB347.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 353.335 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.335 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and
6, a state agency may accept any gift or grant of property or services
from any source only if it is included in an act of the Legislature
authorizing expenditures of nonappropriated money or, when it is
not so included, if it is approved as provided in subsection 2.
2. If:
(a) Any proposed gift or grant is necessary because of an
emergency as defined in NRS 353.263 or for the protection or
preservation of life or property, the Governor shall take reasonable
and proper action to accept it and shall report the action and his or
her reasons for determining that immediate action was necessary to
the Interim Finance Committee at its first meeting after the action is
taken. Action by the Governor pursuant to this paragraph constitutes
acceptance of the gift or grant, and other provisions of this chapter
requiring approval before acceptance do not apply.
(b) The Governor determines that any proposed gift or grant
would be forfeited if the State failed to accept it before the
expiration of the period prescribed in paragraph (c), the Governor
may declare that the proposed acceptance requires expeditious
action by the Interim Finance Committee. Whenever the Governor
so declares, the Interim Finance Committee has 15 days after the
proposal is submitted to its Secretary within which to approve or
deny the acceptance. Any proposed acceptance which is not
considered within the 15-day period shall be deemed approved.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) The proposed acceptance of any gift or grant does not qualify
pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b), it must be submitted to the Interim
Finance Committee. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
353.3375, the Interim Finance Committee has 45 days after the
proposal is submitted to its Secretary within which to consider
acceptance. Any proposed acceptance which is not considered
within the 45-day period shall be deemed approved.
3. The Secretary shall place each request submitted to the
Secretary pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 2 on the
agenda of the next meeting of the Interim Finance Committee.
4. In acting upon a proposed gift or grant, the Interim Finance
Committee shall consider, among other things:
(a) The need for the facility or service to be provided or
improved;
(b) Any present or future commitment required of the State;
(c) The extent of the program proposed; and
(d) The condition of the national economy, and any related fiscal
or monetary policies.
5. A state agency may accept:
(a) Gifts, including grants from nongovernmental sources, not
exceeding [$200,000] $500,000 each in value; and
(b) Governmental grants not exceeding $200,000 each in value,
 if the gifts or grants are used for purposes which do not involve
the hiring of new employees and if the agency has the specific
approval of the Governor or, if the Governor delegates this power of
approval to the Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance, the specific approval of the Chief.
6. This section does not apply to:
(a) The Nevada System of Higher Education;
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services while acting
as the state health planning and development agency pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 2 of NRS 439A.081 or for donations,
gifts or grants to be disbursed pursuant to NRS 433.395 or 435.490;
(c) Legal services provided on a pro bono basis by an attorney
or law firm engaged in the private practice of law to the State of
Nevada or any officer, agency or employee in the Executive
Department of the State Government pursuant to a contract for legal
services entered into by or at the request of the Attorney General in
accordance with NRS 228.112 to 228.1127, inclusive;
(d) Artifacts donated to the Department of Tourism and Cultural
Affairs;
(e) The initial $250,000 received by the Department of Wildlife
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 501.3585 as a gift, donation,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
bequest or devise, or combination thereof, for an unanticipated
emergency event, as defined in NRS 501.3585; or
(f) A gift or grant that will be deposited in a budget account that
consists of money which is not appropriated by or authorized for
expenditure by the Legislature.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)